dictionaries/tr/index.aff
FLAG num
SFX 5453 N 1
SFX 5453 0 mdakininki .

SFX 5454 N 1
SFX 5454 0 mdaymışsınız .

SFX 5455 N 1
SFX 5455 0 mızdakidir .

SFX 5456 N 1
SFX 5456 0 mızdakilerde .

SFX 5457 N 1
SFX 5457 0 mızdakinde .

SFX 5458 N 1
SFX 5458 0 mızdakinden .

SFX 5459 N 1
SFX 5459 0 mızdakiymiş .

SFX 5460 N 1
SFX 5460 0 mızdalardı .

SFX 5461 N 1
SFX 5461 0 mızdasınızdır .

SFX 5462 N 1
SFX 5462 0 ndakinden .

SFX 5463 N 1
SFX 5463 0 nızdakilerle .

SFX 5464 N 1
SFX 5464 0 nızdakinde .

SFX 5465 N 1
SFX 5465 0 sındakileriyse .

SFX 5466 N 1
SFX 5466 0 sındakilerledir .

SFX 5467 N 1
SFX 5467 0 sındakinde .

SFX 5468 N 1
SFX 5468 0 sındakiyse .

SFX 5469 N 1
SFX 5469 0 sındaymışçasına .

SFX 5470 N 1
SFX 5470 0 yadırlar .

SFX 5471 N 1
SFX 5471 0 yalardı .

SFX 5472 N 1
SFX 5472 0 yalardır .

SFX 5473 N 1
SFX 5473 0 yalarmış .

SFX 5474 N 1
SFX 5474 0 yasındır .

SFX 5475 N 1
SFX 5475 0 yasınızdır .

SFX 5476 N 1
SFX 5476 0 yaydık .

SFX 5477 N 1
SFX 5477 0 yaydılar .

SFX 5478 N 1
SFX 5478 0 yaydınız .

SFX 5479 N 1
SFX 5479 0 yayızdır .

SFX 5480 N 1
SFX 5480 0 yaymışçasına .

SFX 5481 N 1
SFX 5481 0 yaymışım .

SFX 5482 N 1
SFX 5482 0 yaymışız .

SFX 5483 N 1
SFX 5483 0 yaymışsınız .

SFX 5484 N 1
SFX 5484 0 yaysak .

SFX 5485 N 1
SFX 5485 0 yaysam .

SFX 5486 N 1
SFX 5486 0 yaysanız .

SFX 5487 N 1
SFX 5487 0 ımdansa .

SFX 5488 N 1
SFX 5488 0 nızdaymışsınız .

SFX 5489 N 1
SFX 5489 0 ımdakinden .

SFX 5490 N 1
SFX 5490 0 ımdakine .

SFX 5491 N 1
SFX 5491 0 ımayız .

SFX 5492 N 1
SFX 5492 0 yorsundur .

SFX 5493 N 1
SFX 5493 0 larındaysalar .

SFX 5494 N 1
SFX 5494 0 ndansanız .

SFX 5495 N 1
SFX 5495 0 takilerdi .

SFX 5496 N 1
SFX 5496 0 mmişiz .

SFX 5497 N 1
SFX 5497 0 tuysak .

SFX 5498 N 1
SFX 5498 0 yıma .

SFX 5499 N 1
SFX 5499 0 yımda .

SFX 5500 N 1
SFX 5500 0 yımdaki .

SFX 5501 N 1
SFX 5501 0 yımı .

SFX 5502 N 1
SFX 5502 0 yımın .

SFX 5503 N 1
SFX 5503 0 selerdik .

SFX 5504 N 1
SFX 5504 0 talardı .

SFX 5505 N 1
SFX 5505 0 ndanım .

SFX 5506 N 1
SFX 5506 0 meydim .

SFX 5507 N 1
SFX 5507 0 imeyken .

SFX 5508 N 1
SFX 5508 0 imeymiş .

SFX 5509 N 1
SFX 5509 0 leyken .

SFX 5510 N 1
SFX 5510 0 ınızlasınız .

SFX 5511 N 1
SFX 5511 0 lerineler .

SFX 5512 N 1
SFX 5512 0 lerininken .

SFX 5513 N 1
SFX 5513 0 lerininkinde .

SFX 5514 N 1
SFX 5514 0 lerininmiş .

SFX 5515 N 1
SFX 5515 0 mdekine .

SFX 5516 N 1
SFX 5516 0 meyken .

SFX 5517 N 1
SFX 5517 0 minkileri .

SFX 5518 N 1
SFX 5518 0 minkilerle .

SFX 5519 N 1
SFX 5519 0 minkilermiş .

SFX 5520 N 1
SFX 5520 0 minkinin .

SFX 5521 N 1
SFX 5521 0 minkiydi .

SFX 5522 N 1
SFX 5522 0 mizeyiz .

SFX 5523 N 1
SFX 5523 0 mizinkiler .

SFX 5524 N 1
SFX 5524 0 mizinkilerden .

SFX 5525 N 1
SFX 5525 0 mizinkilere .

SFX 5526 N 1
SFX 5526 0 mizinkilerin .

SFX 5527 N 1
SFX 5527 0 mizinkinin .

SFX 5528 N 1
SFX 5528 0 mizinmişçesine .

SFX 5529 N 1
SFX 5529 0 mizleydi .

SFX 5530 N 1
SFX 5530 0 mizsek .

SFX 5531 N 1
SFX 5531 0 mledir .

SFX 5532 N 1
SFX 5532 0 neydi .

SFX 5533 N 1
SFX 5533 0 neyken .

SFX 5534 N 1
SFX 5534 0 ninken .

SFX 5535 N 1
SFX 5535 0 ninkilerin .

SFX 5536 N 1
SFX 5536 0 ninkileriyle .

SFX 5537 N 1
SFX 5537 0 ninkinde .

SFX 5538 N 1
SFX 5538 0 ninmişçesine .

SFX 5539 N 1
SFX 5539 0 nizdeyseniz .

SFX 5540 N 1
SFX 5540 0 nizesiniz .

SFX 5541 N 1
SFX 5541 0 nizeyken .

SFX 5542 N 1
SFX 5542 0 nizinkilerden .

SFX 5543 N 1
SFX 5543 0 nizinkileri .

SFX 5544 N 1
SFX 5544 0 nizinkilerle .

SFX 5545 N 1
SFX 5545 0 nizinkinden .

SFX 5546 N 1
SFX 5546 0 nizinkine .

SFX 5547 N 1
SFX 5547 0 nizinkinin .

SFX 5548 N 1
SFX 5548 0 nizinmiş .

SFX 5549 N 1
SFX 5549 0 nizinse .

SFX 5550 N 1
SFX 5550 0 nizlesiniz .

SFX 5551 N 1
SFX 5551 0 nizseniz .

SFX 5552 N 1
SFX 5552 0 sininkileri .

SFX 5553 N 1
SFX 5553 0 sininkilerin .

SFX 5554 N 1
SFX 5554 0 sininkilerle .

SFX 5555 N 1
SFX 5555 0 sininkininse .

SFX 5556 N 1
SFX 5556 0 lerdenken .

SFX 5557 N 1
SFX 5557 0 lerimizken .

SFX 5558 N 1
SFX 5558 0 telerse .

SFX 5559 N 1
SFX 5559 0 ındansınız .

SFX 5560 N 1
SFX 5560 0 lerinizdendi .

SFX 5561 N 1
SFX 5561 0 imdendi .

SFX 5562 N 1
SFX 5562 0 imdenim .

SFX 5563 N 1
SFX 5563 0 imdeniz .

SFX 5564 N 1
SFX 5564 0 imdensek .

SFX 5565 N 1
SFX 5565 0 imdensiniz .

SFX 5566 N 1
SFX 5566 0 indenler .

SFX 5567 N 1
SFX 5567 0 iminkilerden .

SFX 5568 N 1
SFX 5568 0 iminkilerle .

SFX 5569 N 1
SFX 5569 0 iminkinden .

SFX 5570 N 1
SFX 5570 0 inleymiş .

SFX 5571 N 1
SFX 5571 0 inmişçesine .

SFX 5572 N 1
SFX 5572 0 nmişler .

SFX 5573 N 1
SFX 5573 0 ımdakiyle .

SFX 5574 N 1
SFX 5574 0 'nden .

SFX 5575 N 1
SFX 5575 0 nmışımdır .

SFX 5576 N 1
SFX 5576 0 imleydim .

SFX 5577 N 1
SFX 5577 0 ımınkileri .

SFX 5578 N 1
SFX 5578 0 ımlayız .

SFX 5579 N 1
SFX 5579 0 ınınkilerin .

SFX 5580 N 1
SFX 5580 0 larındansan .

SFX 5581 N 1
SFX 5581 0 larınkineyse .

SFX 5582 N 1
SFX 5582 0 larınkininse .

SFX 5583 N 1
SFX 5583 0 imizinse .

SFX 5584 N 1
SFX 5584 0 inlesin .

SFX 5585 N 1
SFX 5585 0 inleydi .

SFX 5586 N 1
SFX 5586 0 inleydik .

SFX 5587 N 1
SFX 5587 0 inleydin .

SFX 5588 N 1
SFX 5588 0 inleyim .

SFX 5589 N 1
SFX 5589 0 inleysek .

SFX 5590 N 1
SFX 5590 0 lerdendin .

SFX 5591 N 1
SFX 5591 0 leydin .

SFX 5592 N 1
SFX 5592 0 ninkininse .

SFX 5593 N 1
SFX 5593 0 yleydik .

SFX 5594 N 1
SFX 5594 0 lardandırlar .

SFX 5595 N 1
SFX 5595 0 larımdandırlar .

SFX 5596 N 1
SFX 5596 0 larındakilerdir .

SFX 5597 N 1
SFX 5597 0 larlaydım .

SFX 5598 N 1
SFX 5598 0 'leridir .

SFX 5599 N 1
SFX 5599 0 'lerinden .

SFX 5600 N 1
SFX 5600 0 'lerine .

SFX 5601 N 1
SFX 5601 0 uyladır .

SFX 5602 N 1
SFX 5602 0 'lerdi .

SFX 5603 N 1
SFX 5603 0 'lerimizin .

SFX 5604 N 1
SFX 5604 0 'lerinin .

SFX 5605 N 1
SFX 5605 0 'lerinizi .

SFX 5606 N 1
SFX 5606 0 'lerinki .

SFX 5607 N 1
SFX 5607 0 'ydiniz .

SFX 5608 N 1
SFX 5608 0 'tur .

SFX 5609 N 1
SFX 5609 0 'uz .

SFX 5610 N 1
SFX 5610 0 aydıysa .

SFX 5611 N 1
SFX 5611 0 ylasın .

SFX 5612 N 1
SFX 5612 0 umdakinin .

SFX 5613 N 1
SFX 5613 0 umsa .

SFX 5614 N 1
SFX 5614 0 larımdasın .

SFX 5615 N 1
SFX 5615 0 umdakini .

SFX 5616 N 1
SFX 5616 0 undanlar .

SFX 5617 N 1
SFX 5617 0 undaydın .

SFX 5618 N 1
SFX 5618 0 umuzdaydı .

SFX 5619 N 1
SFX 5619 0 izdirler .

SFX 5620 N 1
SFX 5620 0 munkilerle .

SFX 5621 N 1
SFX 5621 0 munkini .

SFX 5622 N 1
SFX 5622 0 muzdun .

SFX 5623 N 1
SFX 5623 0 muzdunuz .

SFX 5624 N 1
SFX 5624 0 muzmuşsun .

SFX 5625 N 1
SFX 5625 0 nuzdu .

SFX 5626 N 1
SFX 5626 0 nuzmuş .

SFX 5627 N 1
SFX 5627 0 nuzunkini .

SFX 5628 N 1
SFX 5628 0 nuzuz .

SFX 5629 N 1
SFX 5629 0 sununkine .

SFX 5630 N 1
SFX 5630 0 sununkini .

SFX 5631 N 1
SFX 5631 0 suymuşlar .

SFX 5632 N 1
SFX 5632 0 suymuşuz .

SFX 5633 N 1
SFX 5633 0 'tayız .

SFX 5634 N 1
SFX 5634 0 umuzdunuz .

SFX 5635 N 1
SFX 5635 0 ünüzdedir .

SFX 5636 N 1
SFX 5636 0 ünüzdeyse .

SFX 5637 N 1
SFX 5637 0 mdalarken .

SFX 5638 N 1
SFX 5638 0 undakidir .

SFX 5639 N 1
SFX 5639 0 undakilerde .

SFX 5640 N 1
SFX 5640 0 undakini .

SFX 5641 N 1
SFX 5641 0 undayızdır .

SFX 5642 N 1
SFX 5642 0 undaymışlar .

SFX 5643 N 1
SFX 5643 0 muzdayız .

SFX 5644 N 1
SFX 5644 0 sunaysa .

SFX 5645 N 1
SFX 5645 0 sundakilerde .

SFX 5646 N 1
SFX 5646 0 tuyduk .

SFX 5647 N 1
SFX 5647 0 tuysam .

SFX 5648 N 1
SFX 5648 0 tuysan .

SFX 5649 N 1
SFX 5649 0 tuysanız .

SFX 5650 N 1
SFX 5650 0 uyorlarken .

SFX 5651 N 1
SFX 5651 0 ırlardır .

SFX 5652 N 1
SFX 5652 0 tuydu .

SFX 5653 N 1
SFX 5653 0 tuydum .

SFX 5654 N 1
SFX 5654 0 uyorduysam .

SFX 5655 N 1
SFX 5655 0 umayım .

SFX 5656 N 1
SFX 5656 0 umayken .

SFX 5657 N 1
SFX 5657 0 umaymış .

SFX 5658 N 1
SFX 5658 0 umaysa .

SFX 5659 N 1
SFX 5659 0 talardır .

SFX 5660 N 1
SFX 5660 0 rdum .

SFX 5661 N 1
SFX 5661 0 rdun .

SFX 5662 N 1
SFX 5662 0 rdunuz .

SFX 5663 N 1
SFX 5663 0 rsun .

SFX 5664 N 1
SFX 5664 0 rsunuz .

SFX 5665 N 1
SFX 5665 0 yordunuz .

SFX 5666 N 1
SFX 5666 0 yorlardır .

SFX 5667 N 1
SFX 5667 0 yormuşçasına .

SFX 5668 N 1
SFX 5668 0 yormuşsunuz .

SFX 5669 N 1
SFX 5669 0 yormuşuz .

SFX 5670 N 1
SFX 5670 0 yunuz .
