dictionaries/tr/index.dic
kaşı/17,74,93,95,96,102,126,129,141,174,175,192,197,200,201,205,207,510,511,563,596,606,607,608,609,611,612,613,634,635,639,640,641,643,644,645,646,647,930,1124,1738,2375,3763,5492
kavi/9999,2,3,5,6,38,53,54,257,258,260,284,285,311,313,314,315,316,385,386,387,388,389,390,399,400,530,964,1052,1446,1480,1982,2969,5008,5010,5496
kel/3,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,41,105,223,252,255,256,261,262,263,264,266,267,270,272,274,275,276,277,280,281,282,284,319,328,333,535,539,655,659,660,681,967,977,1184,1245,1872,1873,1918,2462,4609,4610,5507,5508,5509
keman/11,13,14,15,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,49,50,51,61,82,125,126,129,135,151,231,232,234,321,322,521,522,580,591,632,881,882,895,1008,1371,5510
kervan/11,13,14,15,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,49,50,51,61,82,123,125,126,128,135,151,231,232,234,321,437,520,521,522,591,633,736,783,796,832,883,884,885,886,895,898,902,934,943,948,1044,1215,5559
kesen/9999,3,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,41,223,252,256,261,262,263,267,272,275,284,329,336,339,421,652,655,1267,1452,1453,2754,5556
keski/5,7,8,35,39,41,53,255,256,257,259,260,284,315,323,348,359,401,402,403,404,406,1325,1489,1870,1985,1987,1990,2273,2554,3006,3007,3028,3166,3207,5572
KİT/484,1863,1977,2563,3782,3956,4125,4128,4129,5598,5599,5600
KOBİ/237,244,249,294,298,308,309,310,484,1538,1863,1977,2563,3782,3783,3956,4127,4129,4608,5334,5600,5602,5603,5604,5605,5606,5607
komünist/33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,223,252,253,255,256,261,263,272,274,275,277,282,288,318,319,326,328,329,331,333,335,339,341,363,365,655,656,660,983,1174,1175,1197,1227,1268,1291,5591
kuğu/13,14,15,17,19,20,21,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,50,65,117,123,178,224,516,517,534,662,1343,1435,1640,2113,2114,3552,5581
kuma/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,23,25,26,27,29,53,54,64,65,66,90,125,131,132,133,134,146,184,186,448,459,1364,1380,3629,5505,5707,5708,5709,5710
maki/3,5,6,7,8,35,36,37,38,39,41,53,54,252,257,315,323,335,389,402,1986,4072,4124,5444,5445,5532,5533
nisa/12,13,14,16,17,18,19,20,21,53,54,57,64,65,66,70,90,103,104,464,859,1093,1365,1598,2102,2675,5462
oğlan/11,13,14,15,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,49,50,51,59,61,74,82,117,121,122,123,125,126,127,129,135,141,151,174,178,223,224,231,232,233,234,235,321,322,429,437,443,521,522,591,632,736,883,934,1044,1067,1429,3829,5597
reji/9999,2,3,5,6,7,8,35,36,38,39,41,53,54,255,256,257,258,259,260,283,284,285,313,314,315,316,333,335,346,359,385,386,387,388,389,390,391,399,409,964,1229,1240,1326,1425,1472,1479,1980,1982,2236,2243,2245,2720,2721,3445,3466,3467,3469,5518,5531,6049,6050
seçi/3,5,35,36,37,39,54,252,255,256,257,283,316,323,325,333,335,348,383,384,385,386,387,388,389,390,395,399,401,402,421,964,1470,1472,1473,1479,1489,1980,1982,2236,3462,3464,3467,3920,5515
sen/9999,1,2,3,4,105,261,272,319,341,347,361,413,650,659,666,972,977,1227,1229,1230,1231,1234,1235,1256,1267,1442,1445,1446,1447,1692,1864,2137,2266,2397,2399,2400,2511,2512,2526,2570,2571,2641,2642,3149,3260,3893,4118,4669,4906,5096,5230,5586,5588,6093,6094,6095,6096
sevilen/9999,3,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,41,255,256,261,262,272,284,326,333,338,339,5509
stat/14,15,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,48,49,50,52,91,92,117,121,122,123,124,125,128,140,163,224,428,435,439,441,524,577,582,734,787,796,798,860,861,862,863,866,867,868,877,955,1398,1418,1769,2638,5504
talep/34,35,36,37,38,39,41,42,43,223,252,253,254,255,256,283,287,288,318,319,326,327,328,329,330,331,332,333,335,336,338,339,341,365,366,367,368,369,370,371,373,374,381,382,420,421,492,493,494,496,501,1193,1195,1260,1268,1356,1358,1460,1673,1891,2141,2719,2939,5560
tasar/14,22,26,59,61,82,117,135,141,151,164,174,231,232,234,321,430,469,520,521,522,590,591,592,632,633,736,827,829,834,835,841,843,844,845,880,881,882,883,884,885,886,889,890,892,895,896,904,1003,1005,1008,1009,1034,1199,1200,1203,2163,5487
tersi/9999,5,6,8,53,54,284,285,286,311,312,323,325,348,386,388,389,390,395,401,402,407,409,413,422,424,426,485,507,530,532,1325,1870,3055,3057,5444,5445,5532,6330
YÖK/303,306,981,1341,1342,1539,1540,2564,2565,2753,5599,5824
Yusufeli/238,291,292,294,5574
